Washington statutes.
RCW 35.66.010

Authority to establish.

There shall be annexed to the police force of each city in this state having a population of not less than ten thousand inhabitants one or more police matrons who, subject to the control of the chief of police or other proper officer, shall have the immediate care of all females under arrest and while detained in the city prison until they are finally discharged therefrom.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.66.010. Prior: 1893 c 15 s 1; RRS s 9282.]